Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 2. Complaints.

§ 63.2-1508.
Valid report or complaint.

A valid report or complaint means the local department has evaluated the information and allegations of the report or complaint and determined that the local department shall conduct an investigation, family assessment, or human trafficking assessment because the following elements are present:

The alleged victim child or children are under 18 years of age at the time of the complaint or report;

The alleged abuser is the alleged victim child’s parent or other caretaker or, for purposes of abuse or neglect described in subdivision 4 of the definition of “abused or neglected child” in §

63.2-100

, an intimate partner of such parent or caretaker;

The local department receiving the complaint or report has jurisdiction; and

The circumstances described allege suspected child abuse or neglect.

A valid report or complaint regarding a child who has been identified as a victim of sex trafficking or severe forms of trafficking as defined in the federal Trafficking Victims Protection Act of 2000 (22 U.S.C § 7102 et seq.) and in the federal Justice for Victims of Trafficking Act of 2015 (P.L. 114-22) may be established regardless of who the alleged abuser is or whether the alleged abuser has been identified.

Nothing in this section shall relieve any person specified in §

63.2-1509

from making a report required by that section, regardless of the identity of the person suspected to have caused such abuse or neglect.

If the local department receiving the complaint or report does not have jurisdiction, and the local department that has jurisdiction to investigate such complaint or report is located in the Commonwealth, the local department that received the report or complaint shall forward the complaint or report to the appropriate local department.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.2; 1981, c. 123; 1986, c. 308; 1990, c. 760; 1995, c. 520; 2000, c. 500; 2002, c. 747; 2019, cc. 381, 687; 2022, c. 366.

Cross references.

As to types of information required to be made available under the Virginia Child Protection Accountability System, see §

63.2-1530

.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 381 and 687 are identical, and designated the existing provisions as subsections A and C and added subsection B; and substituted “18 years of age” for “the age of eighteen” in subdivision A 1.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by c. 366 inserted “human trafficking assessment” in subsection A; inserted “or, for purposes of abuse or neglect described in subdivision 4 of the definition of "abused or neglected child" in §

63.2-100

, an intimate partner of such parent or caretaker” in subdivision A 2; substituted “regardless of who the alleged abuser is or whether the alleged abuser has been identified” for “if the alleged abuser is the alleged victim child’s parent, other caretaker, or any other person suspected to have caused such abuse or neglect” in subsection B; added subsection D; and made stylistic changes.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Reporting of pregnancy of minor by licensing inspector. —

Virginia Department of Health licensing inspector who is a nurse and who, during the course of a hospital inspection, learns from the review of a medical record that a fourteen-year-old girl received services related to her pregnancy is not required to make a report of child abuse and neglect pursuant to §

63.2-1509

unless there is reason to suspect that a parent or other person responsible for the child’s care committed, or allowed to be committed, the unlawful sexual act upon the child. Nor is the licensing inspector required to make a report to law enforcement of the crime of carnal knowledge of a child between the ages of thirteen and fifteen. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Marissa J. Levine, MD, MPH, FAAFP, State Health Commissioner, No. 14-021,
(9/12/14).

§ 63.2-1509.
Requirement that certain injuries to children be reported by physicians, nurses, teachers, etc.; penalty for failure to report.

The following persons who, in their professional or official capacity, have reason to suspect that a child is an abused or neglected child, shall report the matter immediately to the local department of the county or city wherein the child resides or wherein the abuse or neglect is believed to have occurred or to the Department’s toll-free child abuse and neglect hotline:

Any person licensed to practice medicine or any of the healing arts;

Any hospital resident or intern, and any person employed in the nursing profession;

Any person employed as a social worker or family-services specialist;

Any probation officer;

Any teacher or other person employed in a public or private school, kindergarten, or child day program, as that term is defined in § 22.1-289.02;

Any person providing full-time or part-time child care for pay on a regularly planned basis;

Any mental health professional;

Any law-enforcement officer or animal control officer;

Any mediator eligible to receive court referrals pursuant to §

8.01-576.8

;

Any professional staff person, not previously enumerated, employed by a private or state-operated hospital, institution or facility to which children have been committed or where children have been placed for care and treatment;

Any person 18 years of age or older associated with or employed by any public or private organization responsible for the care, custody or control of children;

Any person who is designated a court-appointed special advocate pursuant to Article 5 (§

9.1-151

et seq.) of Chapter 1 of Title 9.1;

Any person 18 years of age or older who has received training approved by the Department of Social Services for the purposes of recognizing and reporting child abuse and neglect;

Any person employed by a local department as defined in §

63.2-100

who determines eligibility for public assistance;

Any emergency medical services provider certified by the Board of Health pursuant to §

32.1-111.5

, unless such provider immediately reports the matter directly to the attending physician at the hospital to which the child is transported, who shall make such report forthwith;

Any athletic coach, director or other person 18 years of age or older employed by or volunteering with a public or private sports organization or team;

Administrators or employees 18 years of age or older of public or private day camps, youth centers and youth recreation programs;

Any person employed by a public or private institution of higher education other than an attorney who is employed by a public or private institution of higher education as it relates to information gained in the course of providing legal representation to a client;

Any minister, priest, rabbi, imam, or duly accredited practitioner of any religious organization or denomination usually referred to as a church, unless the information supporting the suspicion of child abuse or neglect (i) is required by the doctrine of the religious organization or denomination to be kept in a confidential manner or (ii) would be subject to §

8.01-400

or

19.2-271.3

if offered as evidence in court; and

Any person who engages in the practice of behavior analysis, as defined in §

54.1-2900

.

If neither the locality in which the child resides nor where the abuse or neglect is believed to have occurred is known, then such report shall be made to the local department of the county or city where the abuse or neglect was discovered or to the Department’s toll-free child abuse and neglect hotline.

If an employee of the local department is suspected of abusing or neglecting a child, the report shall be made to the court of the county or city where the abuse or neglect was discovered. Upon receipt of such a report by the court, the judge shall assign the report to a local department that is not the employer of the suspected employee for investigation or family assessment. The judge may consult with the Department in selecting a local department to respond to the report or the complaint.

If the information is received by a teacher, staff member, resident, intern or nurse in the course of professional services in a hospital, school or similar institution, such person may, in place of said report, immediately notify the person in charge of the institution or department, or his designee, who shall make such report forthwith. If the initial report of suspected abuse or neglect is made to the person in charge of the institution or department, or his designee, pursuant to this subsection, such person shall notify the teacher, staff member, resident, intern or nurse who made the initial report when the report of suspected child abuse or neglect is made to the local department or to the Department’s toll-free child abuse and neglect hotline, and of the name of the individual receiving the report, and shall forward any communication resulting from the report, including any information about any actions taken regarding the report, to the person who made the initial report.

The initial report may be an oral report but such report shall be reduced to writing by the child abuse coordinator of the local department on a form prescribed by the Board. Any person required to make the report pursuant to this subsection shall disclose all information that is the basis for his suspicion of abuse or neglect of the child and, upon request, shall make available to the child-protective services coordinator and the local department, which is the agency of jurisdiction, any information, records, or reports that document the basis for the report. All persons required by this subsection to report suspected abuse or neglect who maintain a record of a child who is the subject of such a report shall cooperate with the investigating agency and shall make related information, records and reports available to the investigating agency unless such disclosure violates the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. § 1232g). Provision of such information, records, and reports by a health care provider shall not be prohibited by §

8.01-399

. Criminal investigative reports received from law-enforcement agencies shall not be further disseminated by the investigating agency nor shall they be subject to public disclosure.

For purposes of subsection A, “reason to suspect that a child is abused or neglected” shall, due to the special medical needs of infants affected by substance exposure, include (i) a finding made by a health care provider within six weeks of the birth of a child that the child was born affected by substance abuse or experiencing withdrawal symptoms resulting from in utero drug exposure; (ii) a diagnosis made by a health care provider within four years following a child’s birth that the child has an illness, disease, or condition that, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, is attributable to maternal abuse of a controlled substance during pregnancy; or (iii) a diagnosis made by a health care provider within four years following a child’s birth that the child has a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder attributable to in utero exposure to alcohol. When “reason to suspect” is based upon this subsection, such fact shall be included in the report along with the facts relied upon by the person making the report. Such reports shall not constitute a per se finding of child abuse or neglect. If a health care provider in a licensed hospital makes any finding or diagnosis set forth in clause (i), (ii), or (iii), the hospital shall require the development of a written discharge plan under protocols established by the hospital pursuant to subdivision B 6 of §

32.1-127

.

Any person who makes a report or provides records or information pursuant to subsection A or who testifies in any judicial proceeding arising from such report, records, or information shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability or administrative penalty or sanction on account of such report, records, information, or testimony, unless such person acted in bad faith or with malicious purpose.

Any person required to file a report pursuant to this section who fails to do so as soon as possible, but not longer than 24 hours after having reason to suspect a reportable offense of child abuse or neglect, shall be fined not more than $500 for the first failure and for any subsequent failures not less than $1,000. In cases evidencing acts of rape, sodomy, or object sexual penetration as defined in Article 7 (§

18.2-61

et seq.) of Chapter 4 of Title 18.2, a person who knowingly and intentionally fails to make the report required pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

No person shall be required to make a report pursuant to this section if the person has actual knowledge that the same matter has already been reported to the local department or the Department’s toll-free child abuse and neglect hotline.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.3; 1976, c. 348; 1978, c. 747; 1993, c. 443; 1994, c. 840; 1995, c. 810; 1998, cc. 704, 716; 1999, c. 606; 2000, c. 500; 2001, c. 853; 2002, cc. 747, 860; 2006, cc. 530, 801; 2008, cc. 43, 268; 2012, cc. 391, 504, 640, 698, 728, 740, 815; 2013, cc. 72, 331; 2014, c. 285; 2017, cc. 176, 428; 2019, cc. 98, 295, 414; 2020, cc. 461, 860, 861; 2022, c. 766.

Cross references.

As to compliance by child day care centers operated by religious institutions that are exempt from licensure with the requirements of §

63.2-1509

relating to reporting suspected cases of child abuse and neglect, see §

63.2-1716

. As to privilege protecting communications between certain mental health professionals and clients, see §

8.01-400.2

.

As to the Court-Appointed Special Advocate Program and volunteer court-appointed special advocates, see §

9.1-153

. As to jurisdiction of juvenile and domestic relations district courts, see § 16.1-241. As to orders to protect health and welfare of newborn children, see § 16.1-241.3. As to school’s responsibility to contact parent of student at imminent risk of suicide, see § 22.1-272.1. As to duty to report child abuse or neglect, see § 22.1-291.3. As to reports by physicians and laboratory directors, see §

32.1-36

. As to confidentiality of complainant’s identity, see §

32.1-125.5

. As to health records privacy, see §

32.1-127.1:03

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 860 amended § 63.1-248.3, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 860 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 860, in the last paragraph of subsection A, in the second sentence, substituted “Any” for “The” at the beginning, inserted “pursuant to this subsection,” and inserted “information” following “any,” and added the last three sentences; inserted present subsection C; and redesignated former subsection C as present subsection D.

Acts 2006, c. 530, cl. 2, provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall provide training to effect the purposes of this act.”

Acts 2006, c. 801, cl. 2, provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall create or approve training required by subdivision A 13 of §

63.2-1509

for persons who wish to receive it, at their own expense, in recognizing and reporting suspected child abuse and neglect.”

Acts 2008, c. 268, cl. 3, provides: “That no penalty shall be imposed, pursuant to subsection D of §

63.2-1509

of the Code of Virginia, for a violation of subdivision 15 of subsection A of §

63.2-1509

of the Code of Virginia that occurs prior to July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2008, c. 268, cl. 4, provides: “That the Department of Health shall develop a plan, in consultation with the State Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, to prepare, disseminate and present training materials on reporting suspected child abuse and neglect to newly mandated reporters under subdivision 15 of subsection A of §

63.2-1509

of the Code of Virginia by November 1, 2008.”

Acts 2017, cc. 176 and 428, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 530, effective January 1, 2007, added subdivision A 14 and made related changes.

The 2006 amendment by c. 801, effective January 1, 2007, in subsection A, deleted former subdivision A 7, which read: “Any duly accredited Christian Science practitioner,” redesignated former subdivisions A 8 through A 13 as subdivisions A 7 through A 12, added subdivision A 13 and the present first undesignated paragraph under A 14, and made related changes; and made minor stylistic changes in subsections B and D.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 43 added “or animal control officer” at the end of subdivision A 8.

The 2008 amendment by c. 268, effective March 31, 2009, added subdivision A 15 and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 391 substituted “Any person, 18 years of age or older, who” for “Any person, over the age of 18 years, who” at the beginning of subdivision A 13, added subdivisions A 16 and A 17, and made related changes.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 504 and 640 are identical, and rewrote subsection B, which formerly read: “For purposes of subsection A, ‘reason to suspect that a child is abused or neglected’ shall include (i) a finding made by an attending physician within seven days of a child’s birth that the results of a blood or urine test conducted within 48 hours of the birth of the child indicate the presence of a controlled substance not prescribed for the mother by a physician; (ii) a finding by an attending physician made within 48 hours of a child’s birth that the child was born dependent on a controlled substance which was not prescribed by a physician for the mother and has demonstrated withdrawal symptoms; (iii) a diagnosis by an attending physician made within seven days of a child’s birth that the child has an illness, disease or condition which, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, is attributable to in utero exposure to a controlled substance which was not prescribed by a physician for the mother or the child; or (iv) a diagnosis by an attending physician made within seven days of a child’s birth that the child has fetal alcohol syndrome attributable to in utero exposure to alcohol. When ‘reason to suspect’ is based upon this subsection, such fact shall be included in the report along with the facts relied upon by the person making the report.”

The 2012 amendment by c. 698 added subdivision A 16, which was subsequently renumbered as subdivision 18 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, and made related changes.

The 2012 amendment by c. 728, in subdivision A 11, inserted “18 years of age or older” and “public or”; in subdivision A 13, substituted “18 years of age or older” for “over the age of 18 years”; rewrote subsection D and added subsection E.

The 2012 amendment by c. 740 added the second sentence in the next-to-last paragraph of subsection A, and substituted “as soon as possible, but not longer than 24 hours after having reason to suspect a reportable offense” for “within 72 hours of his first suspicion” in subsection D.

The 2012 amendment by c. 815 inserted “18 years of age or older” and “public or” in subdivision A 11; substituted “18 years of age or older” for “over the age of 18 years” in subdivision A 13; added subdivision A 16, which was subsequently renumbered as A 18; rewrote subsection D, which read: “Any person required to file a report pursuant to this section who fails to do so within 72 hours of his first suspicion of child abuse or neglect shall be fined not more than $500 for the first failure and for any subsequent failures not less than $100 nor more than $1,000.”; and added subsection E.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 72 and 331 are identical, and substituted “provider” for “personnel” twice in subdivision A 15.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 285, effective March 24, 2014, in subdivision A 3, inserted “or family-services specialist.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 176 and 428 are identical, and rewrote the first sentence of subsection B, which read: “For purposes of subsection A, ‘reason to suspect that a child is abused or neglected’ shall include (i) a finding made by a health care provider within six weeks of the birth of a child that the results of toxicology studies of the child indicate the presence of a controlled substance not prescribed for the mother by a physician; (ii) a finding made by a health care provider within six weeks of the birth of a child that the child was born dependent on a controlled substance which was not prescribed by a physician for the mother and has demonstrated withdrawal symptoms; (iii) a diagnosis made by a health care provider at any time following a child’s birth that the child has an illness, disease, or condition which, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, is attributable to in utero exposure to a controlled substance which was not prescribed by a physician for the mother or the child; or (iv) a diagnosis made by a health care provider at any time following a child’s birth that the child has a fetal alcohol spectrum disorder attributable to in utero exposure to alcohol.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 98, in subsection B, inserted “due to the special medical needs of infants affected by substance exposure” in the first sentence and added the third and fourth sentences.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 295 and 414 are identical, and designated the former second paragraph of subdivision A 18 as subdivision A 19 by substituting “19. Any” for “This subsection shall not apply to any regular” and “unless the information supporting the suspicion of child abuse or neglect (i) is” for “as it relates to (i) information” and deleting “information that” preceding “would be subject to §

8.01-400

.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 461 inserted “public or” in subdivision A 16.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and substituted “child day program, as that term is defined in § 22.1-289.02”; for “nursery school” in subdivision A 5.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 766, added subdivision A 20; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975).

for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976).

For comment on student rights in Virginia public schools, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 241 (1988).

For an article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1345 (1998).

For article, “Legal Issues Involving Children,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 741 (2001).

For article surveying developments in family law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (2002).

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

For annual survey article, see “Family Law,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 40 Rules of Evidence. § 40.02 Witnesses. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 2-1013 Agreement to Mediate; No. 5-145 Agreement to Mediate; No. 13-622 Agreement to Mediate.

§ 63.2-1510.
Complaints by others of certain injuries to children.

Any person who suspects that a child is an abused or neglected child may make a complaint concerning such child, except as hereinafter provided, to the local department of the county or city wherein the child resides or wherein the abuse or neglect is believed to have occurred or to the Department’s toll-free child abuse and neglect hotline. If an employee of the local department is suspected of abusing or neglecting a child, the complaint shall be made to the court of the county or city where the abuse or neglect was discovered. Upon receipt of such a report by the court, the judge shall assign the report to a local department that is not the employer of the suspected employee for investigation or family assessment; or, if the judge believes that no local department in a reasonable geographic distance can be impartial in responding to the reported case, the judge shall assign the report to the court service unit of his court for evaluation. The judge may consult with the Department in selecting a local department to respond to the report or complaint. Such a complaint may be oral or in writing and shall disclose all information which is the basis for the suspicion of abuse or neglect of the child.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.4; 1976, c. 348; 1994, c. 840; 2000, c. 500; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Reports by advocates. —

Advocates in domestic violence shelters and sexual assault crisis centers generally are not statutorily mandated to report child abuse and neglect. However, when such an advocate performs activities that would place him under any of the categories in subsection A of §

63.2-1509

, he would be required to report suspected child abuse or neglect. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable G. Manoli Loupassi, Member, House of Delegates, 09-097, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 1 (1/5/10).

§ 63.2-1511.
Complaints of abuse and neglect against school personnel; interagency agreement.

If a teacher, principal or other person employed by a local school board or employed in a school operated by the Commonwealth is suspected of abusing or neglecting a child in the course of his educational employment, the complaint shall be investigated in accordance with §§

63.2-1503

,

63.2-1505

and

63.2-1516.1

. Pursuant to § 22.1-279.1, no teacher, principal or other person employed by a school board or employed in a school operated by the Commonwealth shall subject a student to corporal punishment. However, this prohibition of corporal punishment shall not be deemed to prevent (i) the use of incidental, minor or reasonable physical contact or other actions designed to maintain order and control; (ii) the use of reasonable and necessary force to quell a disturbance or remove a student from the scene of a disturbance that threatens physical injury to persons or damage to property; (iii) the use of reasonable and necessary force to prevent a student from inflicting physical harm on himself; (iv) the use of reasonable and necessary force for self-defense or the defense of others; or (v) the use of reasonable and necessary force to obtain possession of weapons or other dangerous objects or controlled substances or paraphernalia that are upon the person of the student or within his control. In determining whether the actions of a teacher, principal or other person employed by a school board or employed in a school operated by the Commonwealth are within the exceptions provided in this section, the local department shall examine whether the actions at the time of the event that were made by such person were reasonable.

For purposes of this section, “corporal punishment,” “abuse,” or “neglect” shall not include physical pain, injury or discomfort caused by the use of incidental, minor or reasonable physical contact or other actions designed to maintain order and control as permitted in clause (i) of subsection A or the use of reasonable and necessary force as permitted by clauses (ii), (iii), (iv), and (v) of subsection A, or by participation in practice or competition in an interscholastic sport, or participation in physical education or an extracurricular activity.

If, after an investigation of a complaint under this section, the local department determines that the actions or omissions of a teacher, principal, or other person employed by a local school board or employed in a school operated by the Commonwealth were within such employee’s scope of employment and were taken in good faith in the course of supervision, care, or discipline of students, then the standard in determining if a report of abuse or neglect is founded is whether such acts or omissions constituted gross negligence or willful misconduct.

Each local department and local school division shall adopt a written interagency agreement as a protocol for investigating child abuse and neglect reports. The interagency agreement shall be based on recommended procedures for conducting investigations developed by the Departments of Education and Social Services.

History.

2001, c. 588, § 63.1-248.4:1; 2002, c. 747; 2003, cc. 986, 1013; 2005, cc. 767, 806; 2014, c. 412.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 412, cl. 2 provides: “That local school divisions shall report annually to the Board of Education, and local departments of social services shall report annually to the Board of Social Services, regarding the status of interagency agreements for the investigation of complaints of child abuse and neglect against school personnel and reports of sexual abuse of children that require coordination between local departments and local school divisions to facilitate investigation of such complaints and reports. Once such interagency agreement is adopted, the local school division and the local department of social services that are the parties to the interagency agreement shall no longer be required to report annually on the status of the interagency agreement. Thereafter, such parties shall only be required to report to the Board of Education and the Board of Social Services when such interagency agreements are substantially modified.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 986 and 1013 are nearly identical, and substituted “63.2-1505 and

63.2-1516.1

” for “and,

63.2-1505

” in subsection A; and added subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 767 and 806 are identical, and substituted “‘abuse,’ or ‘neglect”’ for “or ‘abused or neglected child”’ in subsection B, added subsection C, and deleted “of social services” near the beginning of subsection D.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 412 deleted “against school personnel” at the end of the first sentence in subsection D.

§ 63.2-1512.
Immunity of person making report, etc., from liability.

Any person making a report pursuant to §

63.2-1509

, a complaint pursuant to §

63.2-1510

, or who takes a child into custody pursuant to §

63.2-1517

, or who participates in a judicial proceeding resulting therefrom shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability in connection therewith, unless it is proven that such person acted in bad faith or with malicious intent.

History.

1975, c. 341, § 63.1-248.5; 1988, c. 686; 2002, c. 747.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975).

§ 63.2-1513.
Knowingly making false reports; penalties.

Any person fourteen years of age or older who makes or causes to be made a report of child abuse or neglect pursuant to this chapter that he knows to be false shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any person fourteen years of age or older who has been previously convicted under this subsection and who is subsequently convicted under this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony.

The child-protective services records regarding the person who was alleged to have committed abuse or neglect that result from a report for which a conviction is obtained under this section shall be purged immediately by any custodian of such records upon presentation to the custodian of a certified copy of such conviction. After purging the records, the custodian shall notify the person in writing that such records have been purged.

History.

1996, cc. 813, 836, § 63.1-248.5:1.01; 1999, c. 828; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.